Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Chapter 115. Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act
§ 3222.
Care of custodial property.

A custodian shall:

take control of custodial property;

register or record title to custodial property if appropriate; and

collect, hold, manage, invest, and reinvest custodial property.

In dealing with custodial property, a custodian shall observe the standard of care that would be observed by a prudent person dealing with property of another and is not limited by any other statute restricting investments by fiduciaries. If a custodian has a special skill or expertise or is named custodian on the basis of representations of a special skill or expertise, the custodian shall use that skill or expertise. However, a custodian, in the custodian’s discretion and without liability to the minor or the minor’s estate, may retain any custodial property received from a transferor.

A custodian may invest in or pay premiums on life insurance or endowment policies on:

the life of the minor only if the minor or the minor’s estate is the sole beneficiary; or

the life of another person in whom the minor has an insurable interest only to the extent that the minor, the minor’s estate, or the custodian in the capacity of custodian is the irrevocable beneficiary.

A custodian at all times shall keep custodial property separate and distinct from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly as custodial property of the minor. Custodial property consisting of an undivided interest is so identified if the minor’s interest is held as a tenant in common and is fixed. Custodial property subject to recordation is so identified if it is recorded, and custodial property subject to registration is so identified if it is either registered or held in an account designated in the name of the custodian, followed in substance by the words: “as a custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

A custodian shall keep records of all transactions with respect to custodial property, including information necessary for the preparation of the minor’s tax returns, and shall make them available for inspection at reasonable intervals by a parent, legal representative of the minor, financial guardian of the minor, or the minor if the minor has attained 14 years of age.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) expands Section 4(a) of the 1966 Act to include the duties to take control and appropriately register or record custodial property in the name of the custodian.

Subsection (b) restates and makes somewhat stricter the prudent man fiduciary standard for the custodian, since it is now cast in terms of a prudent person “dealing with property of another” rather than one “who is seeking a reasonable income and the preservation of his capital,” as under the 1966 Act.
The rule also adds a slightly higher standard for professional fiduciaries.
The rule parallels section 7—302 of the Uniform Probate Code in order to refer to the existing and growing body of law interpreting that standard.
The 1966 Act permitted a custodian to retain any security or bank account received, without the obligation to diversify investment.
This subsection extends that rule to any property received.

In order to eliminate any uncertainty that existed under the 1966 Act, subsection (c) grants specific authority to invest custodial property in life insurance on the minor’s life, provided the minor’s estate is the sole beneficiary, or on the life of another person in whom the minor has an insurable interest, provided the minor, the minor’s estate, or the custodian in his or her custodial capacity is made the beneficiary of such policies.

Subsection (d) generally tracks Section 4(g) of the 1966 Act but adds the provision requiring that custodial property consisting of an undivided interest be held as a tenant in common. This provision permits the custodian to invest custodial property in common trust funds, mutual funds, or in a proportional interest in a “jumbo” certificate of deposit.
Investment in property held in joint tenancy with right of survivorship is not permitted, but the Act does not preclude a transfer of such an interest to a custodian, and the custodian is authorized under subsection (b) to retain a joint tenancy interest so received.

Subsection (e) follows Section 4(h) of the 1966 Act, but adds the requirement that income tax information be maintained and made available for preparation of the minor’s tax returns. Because the custodianship is not a separate legal entity or taxpayer, the minor’s tax identification number should be used to identify all custodial property accounts.

§ 3223.
Powers of custodian.

A custodian, acting in a custodial capacity, has all the rights, powers, and authority over custodial property that unmarried adult owners have over their own property, but a custodian may exercise those rights, powers, and authority in that capacity only.

This section does not relieve a custodian from liability for breach of section 3222 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) replaces the specific list of custodian’s powers in Section 4(f) of the 1966 Act which related only to securities, money, and insurance, then the only permitted kinds of custodial property.
It was determined not to expand the list to try to deal with all forms of property now covered by the Act and to specify all powers that might be appropriate for each kind of property, or to refer to an existing body of state law, such as the Trustee’s Powers Act, since such powers would not be uniform.
Instead, this provision grants the custodian the very broad and general powers of an unmarried adult owner of the property, subject to the prudent person rule and to the duties of segregation and record keeping specified in section 3222 of this chapter.
This approach permits the Act to be self-contained and more readily understandable by volunteer, non-professional fiduciaries, who most often serve as custodians.
It is intended that the authority granted includes the powers most often suggested for custodians, such as the power to borrow, whether at interest or interest free, the power to invest in common trust funds, and the power to enter contracts that extend beyond the termination of the custodianship.

Subsection (a) further specifies that the custodian’s powers or incidents of ownership in custodial property such as insurance policies may be exercised only in his capacity as custodian. This provision is intended to prevent the exercise of those powers for the direct or indirect benefit of the custodian, so as to avoid as nearly as possible the result that a custodian who dies while holding an insurance policy on his own life for the benefit of a minor will have the policy taxed in his or her estate.
See, Section 2042 of the Internal Revenue Code; but compare
Terriberry v. U.S.,
517 F.2d 286 (5th Cir. 1975), and

Rose v. U.S.,

511 F.2d 259 (5th Cir. 1975).

§ 3224.
Use of custodial property.

A custodian may deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit so much of the custodial property as the custodian considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor, without court order and without regard to:

the duty or ability of the custodian personally or of any other person to support the minor; or

any other income or property of the minor that may be applicable or available for that purpose.

On petition of an interested person or the minor if the minor has attained 14 years of age, the court may order the custodian to deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor’s benefit so much of the custodial property as the court considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor.

A delivery, payment, or expenditure under this section is in addition to, not in substitution for, and does not affect any obligation of a person to support the minor.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsections (a) and (b) track subsections (b) and (c) of Section 4 of the 1966 Act, but with two significant changes. The standard for expenditure of custodial property has been amended to read “for the use and benefit of the minor,“ rather than ‘for the support, maintenance, education and benefit of the minor‘ as specified under the 1966 Act.
This change is intended to avoid the implication that the custodial property can be used only for the required support of the minor.

The IRS has taken the position that the income from custodial property, to the extent it is used for the support of the minor-donee, is includable in the gross income of any person who is legally obligated to support the minor-donee, whether or not that person or parent is serving as the custodian. Rev. Rul. 56-484, C.B. 1956-2, 23; Rev. Rul. 59-357, C.B. 1959-2, 212.
However, Reg. 1.662(a)-4 provides that the term “legal obligation” includes a legal obligation to support another person if, and only if, the obligation is not affected by the adequacy of the dependent’s own resources.
Thus, if under local law a parent may use the resources of a child for the child’s support in lieu of supporting the child himself or herself, no obligation of support exists, whether or not income is actually used for support, at least if the child’s resources are adequate.
See,
Bittker, Federal Taxation of Income Estates and Gifts,
¶ 80.4.4 (1981).

For this reason, new subsection (c) has been added to specify that distributions or expenditures may be made for the minor without regard to the duty or ability of any other person to support the minor and that distributions or expenditures are not in substitution for, and shall not affect, the obligation of any person to support the minor.
Other possible methods of avoiding the attribution of custodial property income to the person obligated to support the minor would be to prohibit the use of custodial property or its income for that purpose, or to provide that any such use gives rise to a cause of action by the minor against his parent to the extent that custodial property or income is so used.
The first alternative was rejected as too restrictive, and the second as too cumbersome.

The “use and benefit” standard in subsections (a) and (b) is intended to include payment of the minor’s legally enforceable obligations such as tax or child support obligations or tort claims. Custodial property could be reached by levy of a judgment creditor in any event, so there is no reason not to permit custodian or court-ordered expenditures for enforceable claims.

An “interested person” entitled to seek court ordered distributions under subsection (b) would include not only the parent or conservator or guardian of the minor and a transferor or a transferor’s legal representative, but also a public agency or official with custody of the minor and a third party to whom the minor owes legally enforceable debts.

§ 3225.
Custodian’s expenses, compensation, and bond.

A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian’s duties.

Except for one who is a transferor under section 3214 of this title, a custodian has a noncumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable compensation for services performed during that year.

Except as provided in subsection 3228(f) of this title, a custodian need not give a bond.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section parallels and restates Section 5 of the 1966 Act.
It deletes the statement that a custodian may act without compensation for services, since that concept is implied in the retained provision that a custodian has an “election” to be compensated.
However, to prevent abuse, the latter provision for permissive compensation is denied to a custodian who is also the donor of the custodial property.

The custodian’s election to charge compensation must be exercised (although the compensation need not be actually paid) at least annually or it lapses and may not be exercised later.
This provision is intended to avoid imputed income to the custodian who waives compensation, and also to avoid the accumulation of a large unanticipated claim for compensation exercisable at termination of the custodianship.

This section deletes as surplusage the bracketed optional standards contained in the 1966 Act for determining “reasonable compensation” which included, “in the order stated,” a direction by the donor, statutes governing compensation of custodians or guardians, or court order. While compensation of custodians becomes a more likely occurrence and a more important issue under this Act because property requiring increased management may now be subject to custodianship, compensation can still be determined by agreement, by reference to a statute or by court order, without the need to so state in this Act.

§ 3226.
Exemption of third person from liability.

A third person in good faith and without court order may act on the instructions of or otherwise deal with any person purporting to make a transfer or purporting to act in the capacity of a custodian and, in the absence of knowledge, is not responsible for determining:

the validity of the purported custodian’s designation;

the propriety of or the authority under this chapter for any act of the purported custodian;

the validity or propriety under this chapter of any instrument or instructions executed or given either by the person purporting to make a transfer or by the purported custodian; or

the propriety of the application of any property of the minor delivered to the purported custodian.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section carries forward, but shortens and simplifies, Section 6 of the 1966 Act, with no substantive change intended.
The 1966 revision permitted a 14-year old minor to appoint a successor custodian and specifically provided that third parties were entitled to rely on the appointment. Because this section refers to any custodian, and “custodian” is defined to include successor custodians (section 3211(5) of this chapter), a successor custodian appointed by the minor is included among those upon whom third parties may rely.

Similarly, because this section protects any third “person,” it is not necessary to specify here or in section 3221(c) of this chapter that it extends to any “issuer, transfer agent, bank, life insurance company, broker, or other person or financial institution,” as did the 1966 Act.
See the definition of “person” in section 3211(12).

This section excludes from its protection persons with “knowledge” of the irregularity of a transaction, a concept not expressed but probably implied in Section 6 of the 1966 Act.
See, e.g.,
State ex rel Paden v. Currel,
597 S.W.2d 167 (Mo. App. 1980) (disapproving the pledge of custodial property to secure a personal loan to the custodian).

§ 3227.
Liability to third persons.

A claim based on any of the following may be asserted against the custodial property by proceeding against the custodian in the custodial capacity, whether or not the custodian or the minor is personally liable therefor:

a contract entered into by a custodian acting in a custodial capacity;

an obligation arising from the ownership or control of custodial property; or

a tort committed during the custodianship.

A custodian is not personally liable:

on a contract properly entered into in the custodial capacity unless the custodian fails to reveal that capacity and to identify the custodianship in the contract; or

for an obligation arising from control of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship unless the custodian is personally at fault.

A minor is not personally liable for an obligation arising from ownership of custodial property or for a tort committed during the custodianship, unless the minor is personally at fault.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section has no counterpart in the 1966 Act and is based upon Section 5-429 of the Uniform Probate Code, relating to limitations on the liability of conservators.
Because some forms of custodial property now permitted under this Act can give rise to liabilities as well as benefits (e.g., general partnership interests, interests in real estate or business proprietorships, automobiles, etc.) the Committee believes it is necessary to protect the minor and other assets he or she might have or acquire from such liabilities, since the minor is unable to disclaim a transfer to a custodian for his benefit.
Similar protection for the custodian is necessary so as not to discourage nonprofessional or uncompensated persons from accepting the office.
Therefore this section generally limits the claims of third parties to recourse against the custodial property, as third parties dealing with a trust are generally limited to recourse against the trust corpus.

The custodian incurs personal liability only as provided in subsection (b) for actual fault or for failure to disclose his or her custodial capacity “in the contract” when contracting with third parties. In oral contracts, oral disclosure of the custodial capacity is sufficient.
The minor, on the other hand, incurs personal liability under subsection (c) only for actual fault.

When custodial property is subjected to claims of third parties under this section, the minor or his or her legal representative, if not a party to the action by which the claim is successfully established, may seek to recover the loss from the custodian in a separate action.
See section 3229 of this chapter and the accompanying Comment.

§ 3228.
Renunciation, resignation, death, or removal of custodian; designation of successor custodian.

A person nominated under section 3213 of this title or designated under section 3219 of this title as custodian may decline to serve by delivering a valid disclaimer to the person who made the nomination or to the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative. If the event giving rise to a transfer has not occurred and no substitute custodian able, willing, and eligible to serve was nominated under section 3213 of this title, the person who made the nomination may nominate a substitute custodian under section 3213 of this title; otherwise, the transferor or the transferor’s legal representative shall designate a substitute custodian at the time of the transfer, in either case from among the persons eligible to serve as custodian for that kind of property under subsection 3219(a) of this title. The custodian so designated has the rights of a successor custodian.

A custodian at any time may designate a trust company or an adult other than a transferor under section 3214 of this title as successor custodian by executing and dating an instrument of designation before a subscribing witness other than the successor. If the instrument of designation does not contain or is not accompanied by the resignation of the custodian, the designation of the successor does not take effect until the custodian resigns, dies, becomes incapacitated, or is removed.

A custodian may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the minor if the minor has attained 14 years of age and to the successor custodian, and by delivering the custodial property to the successor custodian.

If a custodian is ineligible, dies, or becomes incapacitated without having effectively designated a successor, and the minor has attained 14 years of age, the minor may designate as successor custodian, in the manner prescribed in subsection (b) of this section, an adult member of the minor’s family, a financial guardian of the minor, or a trust company. If the minor has not attained 14 years of age or fails to act within 60 days after the ineligibility, death, or incapacity, the financial guardian of the minor becomes successor custodian. If the minor has no financial guardian or the financial guardian declines to act, the transferor, the legal representative of the transferor or of the custodian, an adult member of the minor’s family, or any other interested person may petition the court to designate a successor custodian.

A custodian who declines to serve under subsection (a) of this section or resigns under subsection (c) of this section, or the legal representative of a deceased or incapacitated custodian, as soon as practicable, shall put the custodial property and records in the possession and control of the successor custodian. The successor custodian by action may enforce the obligation to deliver custodial property and records and becomes responsible for each item as received.

A transferor, the legal representative of a transferor, an adult member of the minor’s family, the minor’s financial guardian, a guardian of the minor appointed pursuant to section 2628 or 2664 of this title, or the minor if the minor has attained 14 years of age may petition the court to remove the custodian for cause and to designate a successor custodian other than a transferor under section 3214 of this title or to require the custodian to give appropriate bond.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section tracks but condenses Section 7 of the 1966 Act to provide that the custodian, or if the custodian does not do so, the minor if he or she is 14, may appoint the successor custodian, or failing that, that the conservator of the minor or a court appointee shall serve.
It also covers disclaimer of the office by designated or successor custodians or by nominated future custodians who decline to serve.

This Act broadens the category of persons who may be designated by the initial custodian as successor custodian from an adult member of the minor’s family, his or her conservator, or a trust company to any adult or trust company.
However, the minor’s designation remains limited to an adult member of his family (expanded to include a spouse and a stepparent, see section 3211(9) of this chapter), the minor’s conservator, or a trust company.

§ 3229.
Accounting by and determination of liability of custodian.

A minor who has attained 14 years of age, the minor’s financial guardian or legal representative, a guardian of the minor appointed pursuant to section 2628 or 2664 of this title, an adult member of the minor’s family, a transferor, or a transferor’s legal representative may petition the court:

for an accounting by the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative; or

for a determination of responsibility, as between the custodial property and the custodian personally, for claims against the custodial property unless the responsibility has been adjudicated in an action under section 3227 of this title to which the minor, the minor’s legal representative, or the minor’s financial guardian was a party.

A successor custodian may petition the court for an accounting by the predecessor custodian.

The court, in a proceeding under this chapter or in any other proceeding, may require or permit the custodian or the custodian’s legal representative to account.

If a custodian is removed under subsection 3228(f) of this title, the court shall require an accounting and order delivery of the custodial property and records to the successor custodian and the execution of all instruments required for transfer of the custodial property.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section carries forward Section 8 of the 1966 Act, but expands the class of parties who may require an accounting by the custodian to include any person who made a transfer to him or her (or any such person’s legal representative), the minor’s guardian of the person, and the successor custodian.

Subsection (b) authorizes but does not obligate a successor custodian to seek an accounting by the predecessor custodian. Since the minor and other persons mentioned in subsection (a) may also seek an accounting from the predecessor at any time, it is anticipated that the exercise of this right by the successor should be rare.

Subsection (a) also gives the same parties (other than a successor custodian) the right to seek recovery from the custodian for loss or diminution of custodial property resulting from successful claims by third persons under section 3227 of this chapter, unless that issue has already been adjudicated in an action under that section to which the minor was a party.

This section does not contain a separate statute of limitations precluding petitions for accounting after termination of the custodianship.
Because custodianships can be created without the knowledge of the minor, a person might learn of a custodian’s failure to turn over custodial property long after reaching majority, and should not be precluded from asserting his rights in the case of such fraud.
In addition, the 1966 Act has no such preclusion and seems to have worked well.
Other law, such as general statutes of limitation and the doctrine of laches, should serve adequately to protect former custodians from harassment.

§ 3230.
Termination of custodianship.

The custodian shall transfer in an appropriate manner the custodial property to the minor or to the minor’s estate upon the earliest of:

the minor’s attainment of 21 years of age with respect to custodial property transferred under section 3214 or 3215 of this title;

the minor’s attainment of 18 years of age with respect to custodial property transferred under section 3216 or 3217 of this title; or

the minor’s death.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section tracks Section 4(d) of the 1966 Act, but provides that custodianships created by fiduciaries without express authority from the donor of the property under section 3216 of this chapter and by obligors of the minor under section 3217 terminate upon the minor’s attaining the age of majority under the general laws of the state, since these custodianships are substitutes for conservatorships that would otherwise terminate at that time.
Because property in a single custodianship may be distributable at different times, separate accounting for custodial property by source may be required.
See Comment to section 3220.

§ 3231.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to a transfer within the scope of section 3212 of this title made after its effective date if:

the transfer purports to have been made under the Vermont Uniform Gifts to Minors Act; or

the instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation “as custodian under the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act” or “as custodian under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act” of any other state, and the application of this chapter is necessary to validate the transfer.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is new and has two purposes.
First, it operates as a “savings clause” to validate transfers made after its effective date which mistakenly refer to the enacting state’s UGMA rather than to this Act.
Second, it validates transfers attempted under the UGMA of another state which would not permit transfers from that source or of property of that kind or under the UTMA of another state with no nexus to the transaction, provided in each case that the enacting state has a sufficient nexus to the transaction under section 3212 of this chapter.

§ 3232.
Effect on existing custodianships.

Any transfer of custodial property as now defined in this chapter made before July 1, 2015 is validated, notwithstanding that there was no specific authority in the Vermont Uniform Gifts to Minors Act for the coverage of custodial property of that kind or for a transfer from that source at the time the transfer was made.

This chapter applies to all transfers made before July 1, 2015 in a manner and form prescribed in the Vermont Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, except insofar as the application impairs constitutionally vested rights or extends the duration of custodianships in existence on July 15, 2015.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) is new and is based on Section 45-109a of the Connecticut Act which validates gifts of real estate and partnership interests made prior to their inclusion as “custodial property” under that Act.
However, this provision goes further and purports also to validate prior transfers of the kind now covered by the Act, i.e., transfers from estates, trusts, guardianships, and obligors.

All states have previously enacted some version of UGMA, and it will be more orderly to subject gifts or other transfers under the prior Act to the procedures of this Act, rather than to keep both Acts in force, presumably for 18 or 21 years until all custodianships created under prior law have terminated.
Subsection (b) is intended to apply this Act to prior gifts and existing custodianships insofar as it is constitutionally permissible to do so.
However, prior custodianships will continue to terminate at the age prescribed under the prior Act.

§ 3233.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

§ 3234.
Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and, to this end, provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.